North Carolina statutes. Chapter 23. Debtor and Creditor.
Article 2. Petition of Insolvent for Assignment for Creditors. [Repealed]

§§ 23-13 through 23-17.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2020-75, s. 2(a), effective January 1, 2021, and applicable to receiverships commenced on or after that date.

History.

G.S. 23-13

; 1868-9, c. 162, ss. 1, 2, 3; Code, ss. 2942, 2943, 2944; Rev., s. 1930; C.S., s. 1621, repealed by 2020-75, s. 2(a), effective January 1, 2021. G.S. 23-14; 1868-9, c. 162, ss. 4, 5; Code, ss. 2945, 2946; Rev., s. 1931; C.S., s. 1622, repealed by 2020-75, s. 2(a), effective January 1, 2021. G.S. 23-15; 1868-9, c. 162, s. 6; Code, s. 2947; Rev., s. 1932; C.S., s. 1623, repealed by 2020-75, s. 2(a), effective January 1, 2021. G.S. 23-16; 1868-9, c. 162, s. 9; Code, s. 2950; Rev., s. 1933; C.S., s. 1624, repealed by 2020-75, s. 2(a), effective January 1, 2021. G.S. 23-17; 1868-9, c. 162, s. 7; Code, s. 2948; Rev., s. 1934; C.S., s. 1625, repealed by 2020-75, s. 2(a), effective January 1, 2021.